Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
328D]

BOTTLED
WATER

Section

328D-1 Definitions

328D-2 Product quality

328D-3 Manufacturing, operations; requirements

328D-4 Source water monitoring

328D-5 Finished product monitoring

328D-6 Labeling requirements

328D-7 Exemption; soda water, soft drink

328D-8 Rules

328D-9 Administrative penalties

328D-10 Injunctive relief

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next